New York, session 2025-2026, A9401.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 211-b to 2 read as follows: 3 § 211-b. Removal of inactive job postings. 1. For purposes of this 4 section, a job posting shall be deemed inactive when: 5 (a) the employer has filled the position; 6 (b) the employer no longer intends to hire for the position; 7 (c) the position has been eliminated or frozen, or funding for such 8 position has been withdrawn; or 9 (d) the posting was published in error. 10 2. An employer who publicly advertises a job posting shall remove such 11 posting within fourteen days after the posting no longer represents an 12 active, bona fide vacancy. 13 3. Where an employer utilizes a third-party website, job board, or 14 recruitment platform to advertise a job posting, the employer shall 15 notify such third-party within seven days after a job posting becomes 16 inactive and such third-party shall remove the posting within seven days 17 of receiving such notice. 18 4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an employer 19 from maintaining postings: 20 (a) for positions with multiple vacancies; 21 (b) for positions with rolling or continuous recruitment, provided the 22 employer clearly discloses such status in the posting; or 23 (c) required by law or collective bargaining agreements. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14118-01-5 A. 9401 2 1 5. The commissioner shall have the authority to enforce this section. 2 Upon a finding that a violation of this section has occurred, the 3 commissioner may issue: 4 (a) an order directing removal of the inactive posting; 5 (b) a cease-and-desist order; and 6 (c) an administrative fine of not less than one thousand dollars for 7 each violation. 8 6. The commissioner is authorized and directed to promulgate any rules 9 and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.